Washington statutes.
RCW 10.04.100

Verdict of guilty—Proceedings upon.

The judge, if the prisoner is found guilty, shall assess the prisoner's punishment; or if, in the judge's opinion, the punishment the judge is authorized to assess is not adequate to the offense, he or she may so find, and in such case the judge shall order such defendant to enter recognizance to appear in the superior court of the county, and shall also recognize the witnesses, and proceed as in proceedings by a committing magistrate.

[ 1987 c 202 s 152; 1891 c 11 s 2; Code 1881 s 1891; 1873 p 382 s 189; 1854 p 260 s 174; RRS s 1928.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.